District of Columbia statutes.
1-1162.26

Limitations on honoraria and royalties.

(a)

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, neither the Mayor, the Attorney General, the Chairman of the Council, nor any member of the Council or of the State Board of Education, nor any member of his or her immediate family, shall receive honoraria exceeding $10,000 in the aggregate during any calendar year. For the purposes of this subsection, the term “honorarium” means payment of money or anything of value for an appearance, speech, or article; provided, that a reimbursement for or payment of actual and necessary travel expenses incurred shall not be considered honoraria. For the purposes of computing the $10,000 limit on honoraria established under this subsection, an honorarium shall be considered received in the year in which the right to receive the honorarium accrues.

(b)

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, neither the Chairman of the Council, the Mayor, the Attorney General, nor any member of the Chairman of the Council’s, the Mayor’s, or the Attorney General’s immediate family shall accept royalties for works of the Chairman of the Council, the Mayor, or the Attorney General that exceed $10,000 in the aggregate during any calendar year. For the purposes of computing the limit on royalties established under this subsection, a royalty shall be considered received during the calendar year in which the right to receive the royalty accrues.

(c)

For the purposes of this section, any royalty or part of a royalty, or any honorarium or part of an honorarium paid to a charitable organization by or on behalf of a public official shall not be calculated as part of an aggregate total.

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 226, 59 DCR 1862
Dec. 13, 2013, D.C. Law 20-60, § 302(a), 60 DCR 15487

History

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-60 rewrote (b).

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3(a) of the Election Code Conforming Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-143, July 31, 2013, 60 DCR 11799, 20 DCSTAT 1990).

Emergency Legislation

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-60: Section 401(b) of 20-60 provided that § 302 of the act shall apply as of December 13, 2013.

Editor's Notes